Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-92] Initial action on the record.
After a trial by court-martial the record shall be forwarded to the convening
authority, as reviewing authority, and action thereon may be taken by the
person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time
being, a successor in command, or by the governor. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next